inc/flattened/verb_suffixes_flattened_abstract.lexc
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>aa%>%>siwaa%>%>naan2y1%>ag #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+2SgO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+InclO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>aa%>ag #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>aa%>%>naan2y1%>ag #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+2SgO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+InclO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@m%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@m%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@m%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@m%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@m%>%>aa%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@m%>%>aa%>%>minaa%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@m%>%>aa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@m%>%>aa%>%>minaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>aa%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>aa%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>aa%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>aa%>%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProxO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>aa%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+InclO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@m%>%>igo%>%>naan2y1 #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+InclO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+InclO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>minaa%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+InclO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>naan2y1%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+InclO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+InclO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>minaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+2SgO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@m%>%>igo%>%>n%>%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+2SgO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@m%>%>igo%>%>n #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+2PlO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@m%>%>igo%>%>n%>%>aawaa%>%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+2PlO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@m%>%>igo%>%>n%>%>aawaa #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+2PlO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>n%>%>aawaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+2PlO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>n%>%>aawaa%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+2PlO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>n%>%>aawaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+2PlO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>n%>%>aawaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+2SgO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+2SgO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+2SgO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+2SgO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+2SgO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+InclO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+2SgO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+InclO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+InclO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@m%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>naan2y1 #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+InclO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+InclO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>dig #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+InclO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>naan2y1%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+InclO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+InclO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+2SgO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@m%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+2SgO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@m%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+2PlO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@m%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aawaa%>%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+2PlO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@m%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aawaa #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+2PlO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aawaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+2PlO:@R.Person.2@@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@m%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aawaa%>%>dig #;
